Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 255, O.S.L.
2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3-119.1), is amended to read as
follows:

Req. No. 16121 Page 1

Section 3-119.1. A. The State Department of Education shall
make available to school districts an optional electronic universal
application for free or reduced-price meals under the National
School Lunch Act. The application shall at a minimum:
1. Enable parents and legal guardians to complete and
electronically submit applications for free and reduced-price meals
to the school districts in which their students are enrolled
enrolling;
2. Facilitate school districts in collecting and electronically
submitting free and reduced-price meal applications to the State
Department of Education; and
3. Allow for secure transmission of data necessary for
eligibility and enrollment determinations for the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program.
B. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
require school districts, parents, or legal guardians to use the
electronic universal application provided for in subsection A of
this section No minor child shall be admitted to any public school
operating in this state unless and until an application for free or
reduced-price meals under the National School Lunch Act is completed
by the child's parent or legal guardian and returned to the
applicable school district. Applications required by this
subsection shall be provided by the school district to each child's
parent or legal guardian during enrollment or re-enrollment. In
Req. No. 16121 Page 2

lieu of an application for free or reduced-price meals, a child's
parent or legal guardian may complete a form prescribed by the State
Department of Education and provided by the school district to opt
out of the application requirements of this subsection and
participation in the free or reduced-price meals programs.
C. The State Department of Education shall ensure that each
school district in this state provides, on the school district
website and in any notice or publication prepared for parents
regarding free or reduced-price meals, the following information
regarding requirements for school attendance: "For school
enrollment each year, a parent or legal guardian shall provide one
of the following unless automatically qualified for free or reduced-
price meals under federal law:
1. A completed application for free or reduced-price meals; or
2. A completed and signed free or reduced-price meals program
opt-out form".
D. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section:
1. School districts, schools, and enrolled students attending
such schools that qualify for and participate in the Community
Eligibility Provision (CEP) as provided in the federal Healthy,
Hunger-Free Kids Act of 2010 and in Part 245 of Title 7 of the Code
of Federal Regulations, shall be exempt from the requirements of
this section; and

Req. No. 16121 Page 3

2. Identified students as defined in Section 245.9 of Title 7
of the Code of Federal Regulations, who are not subject to
verification or are certified for free meals through means other
than an application in accordance with federal law, shall not be
required to fill out an application or opt-out form under this
section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16121 SW 02/05/26











Req. No. 16121 Page 4